North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 10. Penalties. [Repealed]

§§ 53-124 through 53-135.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-124; 1921, c. 4, s. 79; C.S., s. 224(a); 1993, c. 539, s. 1265; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-125; 1921, c. 4, s. 80; C.S., s. 224(b); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1993, c. 539, s. 420; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 129, s. 25; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-126; 1927, c. 29, s. 1; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1993, c. 539, s. 421; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-127; 1921, c. 4, s. 81; C.S., s. 224(c); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1943, c. 543; 1985, c. 677, s. 6; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 805, s. 1; 1991, c. 680, s. 4; 1993, c. 539, s. 422; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2001-193, s. 16; 2005-162, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-128; 1921, c. 4, s. 82; C.S., s. 224(d); 1989, c. 187, s. 17; 1993, c. 539, s. 423; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-129; 1921, c. 4, s. 83; C.S., s. 224(e); 1927, c. 47, s. 16; 1979, c. 760, s. 5; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1316, s. 47; 1981, c. 63, s. 1; c. 179, c. 14; 1993, c. 539, s. 1266; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-443, s. 19.25(m); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-130; 1903, c. 275, s. 27; Rev., s. 3326; C.S., s. 4402; 1993, c. 539, s. 1267; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-131; 1921, c. 4, s. 84; C.S., s. 224(f); 1993, c. 539, s. 1268; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-132; 1921, c. 4, s. 85; C.S., s. 224(g); 1927, c. 47, s. 17; 1993, c. 539, s. 1269; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-133; 1921, c. 4, s. 86; C.S., s. 224(h); 1998-215, s. 31; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-134: Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 56, s. 4; C.S., s. 224(i); 1927, c. 47, s. 18; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1993, c. 257, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 424; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-135; 1921, c. 4, s. 87; C.S., s. 224(j); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.